Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.430

Certificates of weight and invoices to be carried with loads.

Certificates of weight issued by licensed public weighmasters and invoices for sales by a retail merchant, if the commodity is being hauled by or for such retail merchant, shall be carried with all loads of hay, straw or grain when in transit.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 14.]